Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
Public Pension Oversight Board

7A.200.
Public Pension Oversight Board.

The Public Pension Oversight Board of the Kentucky General Assembly is hereby established. The purpose of the board shall be to review, analyze, and provide oversight to the General Assembly on the benefits, administration, investments, funding, laws and administrative regulations, and legislation pertaining to the state-administered retirement systems.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 120, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2015 ch. 27, § 1, effective June 24, 2015.

7A.210.
Definitions for KRS 7A.200 to 7A.260.

As used in KRS

7A.200

to

7A.260

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Board” means the Public Pension Oversight Board;

“State-administered retirement systems” means:

The State Police Retirement System as provided by KRS

16.505

to

16.652

;

The Kentucky Employees Retirement System as provided by KRS

61.510

to

61.705

;

The County Employees Retirement System as provided by KRS

78.510

to

78.852

;

The Legislators’ Retirement Plan as provided by KRS

6.500

to

6.577

;

The Judicial Retirement Plan as provided by KRS

21.345

to

21.580

; and

The Kentucky Teachers’ Retirement System as provided by KRS

161.220

to

161.716

; and

“State agency” means any department, commission, council, board, bureau, committee, institution, legislative body, agency, government corporation, or other entity of the executive, judicial, or legislative branch of the state government.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 120, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2015 ch. 27, § 2, effective June 24, 2015.

7A.220.
Membership of board.

The Public Pension Oversight Board shall be composed of the following twenty-three (23) members:

Four (4) members of the General Assembly appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, each of whom shall serve while a member of the House for the term for which he or she has been elected, one (1) of whom shall be the chair or a vice chair of the House Standing Committee on Appropriations and Revenue; and

Two (2) members of the General Assembly appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, each of whom shall serve while a member of the House for the term for which he or she has been elected, and who each shall be selected to ensure representation on the board by House members of the General Assembly is in closer proportion to the representation of each political party in the House of Representatives.

Of the members appointed pursuant to this paragraph, the Speaker shall designate one (1) as co-chair of the board;

Four (4) members of the General Assembly appointed by the President of the Senate, each of whom shall serve while a member of the Senate for the term for which he or she has been elected, one (1) of whom shall be the chair or a vice chair of the Senate Standing Committee on Appropriations and Revenue; and

Two (2) members of the General Assembly appointed by the President of the Senate, each of whom shall serve while a member of the Senate for the term for which he or she has been elected, and who each shall be selected to ensure representation on the board by Senate members of the General Assembly is in closer proportion to the representation of each political party in the Senate.

Of the members appointed pursuant to this paragraph, the President shall designate one (1) as co-chair of the board;

Two (2) members of the General Assembly appointed by the Minority Floor Leader of the Senate, who shall serve while a member of the Senate for the term for which he or she has been elected;

Two (2) members of the General Assembly appointed by the Minority Floor Leader of the House of Representatives, who shall serve while a member of the House for the term for which he or she has been elected;

One (1) individual appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, who shall be certified as a chartered financial analyst (CFA) with at least ten (10) years of investment experience or who shall possess at least ten (10) years of retirement experience as defined by subsection (2) of this section;

One (1) individual appointed by the President of the Senate, who shall be certified as a chartered financial analyst (CFA) with at least ten (10) years of investment experience or who shall possess at least ten (10) years of retirement experience as defined by subsection (2) of this section;

The state budget director or his or her designee;

The Auditor of Public Accounts or his or her designee;

The Attorney General or his or her designee; and

Two (2) individuals appointed by the Governor, one (1) of whom shall be certified as a chartered financial analyst (CFA) with at least ten (10) years of investment experience and one (1) of whom shall possess at least ten (10) years of retirement experience as defined by subsection (2) of this section.

For purposes of this section, “retirement experience” means:

Experience in retirement or pension plan management;

A certified public accountant with relevant experience in retirement or pension plan accounting;

An actuary with relevant experience in retirement or pension plan consulting;

An attorney licensed to practice law in the Commonwealth of Kentucky with relevant experience in retirement or pension plans; or

A current or former university professor whose primary area of emphasis is economics or finance.

Individuals appointed under subsection (1)(e), (f), and (j) of this section shall not:

Be a member of the General Assembly;

Be employed by a state agency of the Commonwealth of Kentucky or receiving a contractual payment for services rendered to a state agency of the Commonwealth of Kentucky that would conflict with his or her service to the board; or

Serve more than three (3) consecutive four (4) year terms on the board.

Any vacancy which may occur in the membership of the board shall be filled by the appointing authority who made the original appointment.

Individuals appointed under subsection (1)(e), (f), and (j) of this section shall serve a term of four (4) years.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 120, § 3, effective July 1, 2013; 2015 ch. 27, § 3, effective June 24, 2015; 2017 ch. 12, § 9, effective March 10, 2017; 2022 ch. 216, § 27, effective April 14, 2022.

7A.230.
Co-chairs of board — Meetings — Reimbursement of members — Employees and operating costs.

The co-chairs of the Public Pension Oversight Board shall have joint responsibilities for board meeting agendas and presiding at board meetings.

On an alternating basis, each co-chair shall have the first option to set the monthly meeting date. A monthly meeting may be canceled by agreement of both co-chairs. The board shall meet at least twice during each calendar year.

Members of the board shall be entitled to reimbursement for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

A majority of the entire membership of the Public Pension Oversight Board shall constitute a quorum, and all actions of the board shall be by vote of a majority of its entire membership.

The Legislative Research Commission shall have exclusive jurisdiction over the employment of personnel necessary to carry out the provisions of KRS

7A.200

to

7A.260

. Staff and operating costs of the Public Pension Oversight Board shall be provided from the budget of the Legislative Research Commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 120, § 4, effective July 1, 2013.

7A.240.
Authority of board.

The Public Pension Oversight Board shall have the authority to:

Except for information protected under KRS

61.661

or

161.585

or information specific to the account of a current or former employee or retiree, require the state-administered retirement systems, or any other state agency, to provide any and all information necessary to carry out the duties of the board, including any actuarial analysis. The cost of providing the information to the board, including any actuarial analysis, shall be included in the administrative budget of the state-administered retirement systems or the state agency;

Conduct public hearings in furtherance of its general duties, at which it may request the appearance of officials of any state agency and solicit the testimony of interested groups and the general public;

Establish a uniform format for reports and data submitted to the board by the state-administered retirement systems and the frequency and due dates for the reports and data;

Request the Auditor of Public Accounts to perform a financial or special audit of the state-administered retirement systems; and

Subject to selection and approval by the Legislative Research Commission, utilize the services of consultants, actuaries, managers, legal counsel, and auditors to render professional, managerial, and technical assistance, as needed. The cost for actuarial services required by KRS 7A.250(8) and (9) shall be paid by the state-administered retirement systems to the Legislative Research Commission and shall be included in the administrative budget of the state-administered retirement systems.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 120, § 5, effective July 1, 2013; 2015 ch. 27, § 4, effective June 24, 2015; 2016 ch. 133, § 2, effective July 15, 2016.

7A.250.
Powers and duties of board.

The Public Pension Oversight Board:

Shall, from time to time, conduct an impartial review of all the laws governing the state-administered retirement systems and recommend any changes it may find desirable with respect to benefits and administration, funding of benefits, investments of funds, and the improvement of language, structure, and organization of the statutes;

May, once every five (5) years, review the benefits provided to employees who begin participating in the systems administered by Kentucky Retirement Systems or the County Employees Retirement System on or after January 1, 2014, and recommend any changes to the provisions affecting these employees that are necessary to maintain the actuarial soundness of the systems;

Shall review semiannually the investment programs of the state-administered retirement systems, including a review of asset allocation targets and ranges, risk factors, asset class benchmarks, total return objectives, relative volatility, performance evaluation guidelines, investment policies, and securities litigation policies and recoveries from fraud or other corporate malfeasance. The board may establish an advisory committee, as provided by KRS

7A.260

, which may include investment professionals to assist in complying with the provisions of this subsection;

May review any benefits, bylaws, policies, or charters established by the state-administered retirement systems;

Shall, at the request of the Speaker of the House of Representatives or the President of the Senate, evaluate proposed changes to laws affecting the state-administered retirement systems and report to the Speaker or the President on the probable costs, actuarial implications, and desirability as a matter of public policy;

May review all new or amended administrative regulations of the state-administered retirement systems and provide comments to the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee established by KRS

13A.020

;

Shall research issues related to the state-administered retirement systems as directed by the Legislative Research Commission;

Shall at least once every five (5) years have an actuarial audit performed for the state-administered retirement systems to evaluate the reliability of each system’s actuarial assumptions and methods. The actuarial audit shall be performed by an actuary retained by the Public Pension Oversight Board;

May prior to each budget biennium occurring on or after July 1, 2020, have an actuarial review of the funding requests and needs submitted by the state-administered retirement systems. The review shall be performed by an actuary retained by the Public Pension Oversight Board;

Shall once every four (4) years review the administrative expenses of the state-administered retirement systems. The review shall include but not be limited to evaluating the level and growth of administrative costs, the potential for legislative changes to reduce administrative costs, and administrative changes the systems may make to reduce administrative costs and staffing needs; and

Shall publish an annual report covering the board’s evaluation and recommendations with respect to the operations of the state-administered retirement systems. The report shall be submitted to the Legislative Research Commission no later than December 31 of each year and shall include at a minimum any legislative recommendations made by the board, a summary of the financial and actuarial condition of the state-administered retirement systems, and an analysis of the adequacy of the current levels of funding.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 120, § 6, effective July 1, 2013; 2015 ch. 27, § 5, effective June 24, 2015; 2016 ch. 133, § 3, effective July 15, 2016; 2018 ch. 107, § 81, effective July 14, 2018; 2020 ch. 79, § 10, effective April 1, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(12/13/2018). On December 13, 2018, the Kentucky Supreme Court ruled that the passage of 2018 SB 151 (2018 Ky. Acts ch. 107), did not comply with the three-readings rule of Kentucky Constitution Section 46 and that the legislation is, therefore, constitutionally invalid and declared void. That ruling applies to changes made to this statute in that Act.

7A.255.
Annual report of information on state-administered retirement systems’ members and recipients of retirement allowances — Protection of members’ and recipients’ identities — Report to Public Pension Oversight Board — Investment procurement policy — Annual report on disability payments. [Effective until April 1, 2023]

Notwithstanding KRS

21.345

to

21.580

,

61.661

,

61.870

to

61.884

, or

161.585

to the contrary, on or before November 15 following the close of each fiscal year, the state-administered retirement systems shall collectively file a report with the Public Pension Oversight Board that shall include the following information for each member or recipient of a retirement allowance from any of the state-administered retirement systems:

A unique identification number for each member or recipient that is created solely for purposes of compiling the report provided by this section and which shall not be the member’s Social Security number or personal identification number issued by the systems. For individual members or recipients with multiple accounts in the state-administered retirement systems, all of the state-administered retirement systems shall use the same unique identification number;

The system or systems in which the member has an account or from which the retired member is receiving a monthly retirement allowance;

The status of the member or recipient, including but not limited to whether he or she is a contributing member, a member who is not currently contributing to the systems but has not retired, a retired member, a beneficiary, or a retired member who has returned to work following retirement with an agency participating in the systems;

If the individual is a retired member or beneficiary, the annualized monthly retirement allowance that he or she was receiving at the end of the most recently completed fiscal year; and

If the individual is a member who has not yet retired, the estimated annual retirement allowance that he or she is eligible to receive at his or her normal retirement date based upon his or her service credit, final compensation, and accumulated account balance at the end of the most recently completed fiscal year.

Under no circumstances shall the member’s name, address, or Social Security number be included in the information required to be reported to the board by this section, nor shall the unique identification number established by subsection (1) of this section be capable of being linked to a specific member’s retirement account with a state-administered retirement system.

On or before November 15 following the close of each fiscal year, the state-administered retirement systems shall report to the Public Pension Oversight Board the percentage of system assets and managers for which fees and commissions are being reported in accordance with KRS 21.540(4)(m), 61.645(19)(i), and 161.250(4)(i). This subsection shall apply on a fiscal year basis beginning on or after July 1, 2017.

On or before November 15, 2017, the state-administered retirement systems shall tender to the Public Pension Oversight Board a copy of their board-adopted investment procurement policy along with certification from the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet that the investment procurement policy meets or does not meet the best practices for investment management procurement. If the board amends its investment procurement policy, it shall tender a copy of its amended investment procurement policy to the Public Pension Oversight Board within sixty (60) days of adoption along with certification from the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet that the policy meets or does not meet the best practices for investment management procurement.

On or before November 15 following the close of each fiscal year, the Kentucky Public Pensions Authority shall report to the Public Pensions Oversight Board the number of individuals and total payments to members who become totally and permanently disabled as a direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS

16.505

or become disabled as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS

61.621

. The data shall be broken down by system and for recipients who are drawing a benefit from the disablement of a hazardous member, a nonhazardous member who worked in a nonhazardous position that could be certified as a hazardous position based upon KRS

61.592

, and a nonhazardous member who worked in a nonhazardous position that could not be certified as a hazardous position based upon KRS

61.592

.

HISTORY:

2016 ch. 27, § 1, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 12, § 10, effective March 10, 2017; 2021 ch. 106, § 9, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2021). See 2021 Ky. Acts Ch. 106, secs. 10, 11, 12, and 13 for information regarding the application of the amendments to this statute made in that Act.

(7/15/2016).
2016 Ky. Acts ch. 27, sec. 2 states that “The Public Pension Oversight Board may utilize the information provided by Section 1 of this Act (
KRS

7A.255

) to carry out the duties of the board as provided by
KRS

7A.250

or to respond to data requests from members of the Public Pension Oversight Board or members of the General Assembly.”

7A.255.
Annual report of information on state-administered retirement systems’ members and recipients of retirement allowances — Protection of members’ and recipients’ identities — Report to Public Pension Oversight Board — Investment procurement policy — Annual report on disability payments — Annual report on employer pay credits. [Effective April 1, 2023]

Notwithstanding KRS

21.345

to

21.580

,

61.661

,

61.870

to

61.884

, or

161.585

to the contrary, on or before November 15 following the close of each fiscal year, the state-administered retirement systems shall collectively file a report with the Public Pension Oversight Board that shall include the following information for each member or recipient of a retirement allowance from any of the state-administered retirement systems:

A unique identification number for each member or recipient that is created solely for purposes of compiling the report provided by this section and which shall not be the member’s Social Security number or personal identification number issued by the systems. For individual members or recipients with multiple accounts in the state-administered retirement systems, all of the state-administered retirement systems shall use the same unique identification number;

The system or systems in which the member has an account or from which the retired member is receiving a monthly retirement allowance;

The status of the member or recipient, including but not limited to whether he or she is a contributing member, a member who is not currently contributing to the systems but has not retired, a retired member, a beneficiary, or a retired member who has returned to work following retirement with an agency participating in the systems;

If the individual is a retired member or beneficiary, the annualized monthly retirement allowance that he or she was receiving at the end of the most recently completed fiscal year; and

If the individual is a member who has not yet retired, the estimated annual retirement allowance that he or she is eligible to receive at his or her normal retirement date based upon his or her service credit, final compensation, and accumulated account balance at the end of the most recently completed fiscal year.

Under no circumstances shall the member’s name, address, or Social Security number be included in the information required to be reported to the board by this section, nor shall the unique identification number established by subsection (1) of this section be capable of being linked to a specific member’s retirement account with a state-administered retirement system.

On or before November 15 following the close of each fiscal year, the state-administered retirement systems shall report to the Public Pension Oversight Board the percentage of system assets and managers for which fees and commissions are being reported in accordance with KRS 21.540(4)(m), 61.645(19)(i), and 161.250(4)(i). This subsection shall apply on a fiscal year basis beginning on or after July 1, 2017.

On or before November 15, 2017, the state-administered retirement systems shall tender to the Public Pension Oversight Board a copy of their board-adopted investment procurement policy along with certification from the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet that the investment procurement policy meets or does not meet the best practices for investment management procurement. If the board amends its investment procurement policy, it shall tender a copy of its amended investment procurement policy to the Public Pension Oversight Board within sixty (60) days of adoption along with certification from the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet that the policy meets or does not meet the best practices for investment management procurement.

On or before November 15 following the close of each fiscal year, the Kentucky Public Pensions Authority shall report to the Public Pension Oversight Board the number of individuals and total payments to members who become totally and permanently disabled as a direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS

16.505

or become disabled as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS

61.621

. The data shall be broken down by system and for recipients who are drawing a benefit from the disablement of a hazardous member, a nonhazardous member who worked in a nonhazardous position that could be certified as a hazardous position based upon KRS

61.592

, and a nonhazardous member who worked in a nonhazardous position that could not be certified as a hazardous position based upon KRS

61.592

.

On or before November 15, 2023, and on or before November 15 every fourth year thereafter, the Department of Kentucky State Police and the Kentucky Public Pensions Authority shall jointly report to the Public Pension Oversight Board on the costs and effectiveness of the program established by KRS 16.583(2)(b)2. and

16.584

.

HISTORY:

2016 ch. 27, § 1, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 12, § 10, effective March 10, 2017; 2021 ch. 106, § 9, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 181, § 4, effective April 1, 2023.

7A.260.
Advisory committees.

The officers and personnel of any state agency and any other person may serve at the request of the board upon any advisory committees that the board may create. State officers and personnel may serve upon these advisory committees without forfeiture of office or employment and with no loss or diminution in the compensation, status, rights, and privileges which they otherwise enjoy.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 120, § 7, effective July 1, 2013.